Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.250

Advisory council on historic preservation—Members.

(1) There is hereby established an advisory council on historic preservation, which shall be composed of nine members appointed by the governor as follows:

(a) A representative of a local or state heritage organization;

(b) Six members of the public who are interested and experienced in matters to be considered by the council including the fields of history, architecture, and archaeology;

(c) A representative from the Washington archaeological community; and

(d) A native American.

(2) Each member of the council shall serve a four-year term.

(3) A vacancy in the council shall not affect its powers, but shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.

(4) The chairperson of the council shall be designated by the governor.

(5) Five members of the council shall constitute a quorum.

[ 1995 c 150 s 1. Prior: 1993 c 185 s 1; 1993 c 101 s 12; 1983 c 91 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 185: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1993." [ 1993 c 185 s 2.]

Findings—1993 c 101: See note following RCW 27.34.010.